Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB478.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 65.111 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Emergency response" means a response by any first responder to a reported
incident that is of such an emergent nature that jeopardizes or could
jeopardize personal safety or result in the destruction of property;
(b) "Emergency response fee" means any charge or fee, other than a membership
charge or subscriber fee levied under KRS Chapter 273, imposed by a fire
department, whether paid or volunteer, ambulance provider, law enforcement
agency, or other organization to cover the costs associated with an emergency
response, including but not limited to costs incurred for labor, materials,
supplies, or equipment used or provided in the response; and
(c) "First responder" means fire, police, and emergency medical personnel.
(2) (a) No local government, special district, or other provider of any emergency
response service shall submit any demand for payment or require a landlord
to pay any emergency response fee if the emergency response:
1. Arises out of the actions of a residential tenant or his or her guest;
and
2. Was not the result of any failure by the landlord to maintain a
building in compliance with applicable housing, building, plumbing,
electrical, fire, health, or nuisance code requirements[an owner of
property occupied by an individual other than the owner to pay any
emergency response fee that arises out of the actions of another over
which the owner has no control].
(b) Nothing in paragraph (a) of this subsection shall prevent a local
government, special district, or other provider of any emergency response
Page 1 of 2
XXXX 2/12/2025 9:32 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1648
service from submitting a demand for payment of an emergency response
fee from a responsible party.
Page 2 of 2
XXXX 2/12/2025 9:32 AM Jacketed